Washington statutes.
RCW 28A.225.240

Apportionment credit.

*** CHANGE IN 2025 *** (SEE 5253-S.SL) ***

If a student under the age of twenty-one years is allowed to enroll in any common school outside the school district within which the student resides or a school district of which the student is considered to be a resident for attendance purposes by operation of law, the student's attendance shall be credited to the nonresident school district of enrollment for state apportionment and all other purposes.

[ 1975 1st ex.s. c 66 s 2. Formerly RCW 28A.58.243.]

NOTES:

Severability—1975 1st ex.s. c 66: See note following RCW 28A.225.230.